Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-851
Teachers; status rights.

The unified system or reorganized school district or districts may terminate, in accordance with sections 79-824 to 79-842, the contracts of employment of teachers whose employer's school district was or is to be closed, merged, or otherwise altered as provided for unified systems or reorganized school districts in section 79-850, except that such teachers shall for the purpose of reduction in force be considered teachers of the unified system or reorganized school district or districts and the teachers shall be given full credit for the years of teaching experience they had acquired as well as the same tenure or permanent status rights they had in the school district or districts affected by the unification or reorganization.

Laws 1980, LB 844, § 2;

Laws 1984, LB 634, § 1;

Laws 1988, LB 520, § 6;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-12,105;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 481;

Laws 1998, LB 1219, § 2.

Reduction-in-force policy, see sections 79-846 to 79-849.